hunspell/nb_NO.dic
absolutistisk/VX
affisere/EJOSYZ
aforistisk/VX
akkordere/EJORSYt
aksepter/VWZ
aktivere/EJORSYZ_t
alaskisk/VX
allmennvidenskap/AZ
allmennvitskap/Z
almenvitskap/Z
alminnelig/aVXw
amme/ACEGJMSTYt
analogisk/VX
animistisk/VX
anonymisere/EJORSYt
ans/EGKVWZ
anstøt/BCGZ
antenne/ACEGJRSYZuvz
antiguansk/VX
anvende/EJORSYZuv
apsidal/VWX
arge/CEJMSTYx
armstykk/VWX
assimilere/EJORSYZt
assosiativ/VWX
atskillig/VX
automatisere/EJORSY_tz
avbleiket/MTX
avhend/CEJKVZ
avkolonisere/EJOSY
avsett/EKVZ
avsky/EGJLPSYZtz
bakteriell/VWXz
balsamere/EJORSY_t
basisk/VX
bebygg/EKVZ
bede/CEGHJORSWYz
bederv/CEKVZ
begrip/EKVZ
begunstige/CEJMSTYv
behjertet/CMTXw
beklag/CEKVZ
belaste/CEJMRSTY`yz
bengelaktig/VX
berekn/hCEKVZ
berekne/CEJMRSTYZtu
berg/BCEGHJKVXZ[z
beskylde/EJORSYty
bestandig/aVXwz
bestikk/BCEGHKVZz
besvære/CEGJMORSTYt
betenk/EKVWZ
beveg/CEKVZ
bevinget/CMTX
bi/ACEGHJKPSVWY
bibelvidenskap/AZ
bindegalen/VWX
bisn/CEGKVZ
blande/BCEGJMRSTYZ_tz
bleik/CEGKVWXz
blekne/CEJMSTY
blyantskreven/VX
boikotte/ACEGJMRSTYt
bokstav/AEFGHJZz
borg/ACEFGHJKVXz
brake/BCEGHJMORSTYt
breipannet/CMTX
brenne/EJRSYZ_t
bruen/KVX
brune/ACEGJMORSTY_tt
bryte/EFJRSYZ`ty
bulgarsk/EGVX
bunnfryse/EJOSY
bære/BCEGHJRSYZtz
bøllet/CTX
bøy/ACEGHKSVYZt
cubansk/EGVX
danse/ACEFGHJMRSTYZ[tz
daustekt/VX
debutere/EJORSYtz
definere/EJORSYZtz
dele/ACEFGHJORSWYZ_tuz
delirant/AEGVX
dempe/CEJMRSTYtyz
derivere/EJORSYZZtz
diabetisk/VX
diagnostisere/EJORSYZ_tz
digitalisere/EJORSY_t
diminutiv/BCEGVWX
diskontere/EJORSYZ_t
dissosiere/EJOSY
djuplendt/VX
dokumentere/EJORSYZt
dramaturgisk/VX
drasjere/EJORSYt
dreie/CEGJMQRSTYZtuy
drikke/AEGHJRSWYZtuz
drive/CEFGIJRSWYZtuz
dublere/EJORSYt
dug/EKVZ
duknakket/CMTX
dypgrønn/VWX
dysse/CEGJMRSTYt
død/ACEGJKVWXZ\z
edru/VXZx
eftertrykk/BZ
egal/VWXy
eitre/BCEGJMRSTY
eksakt/VXw
ekstensiv/EVWX
elevere/EJORSYt
ellevill/VWXw
elsk/CEFGKVZ
emulgere/EJORSYZt
eng/ACEGHJVWX
engst/CEKVZ
epidemisk/VX
erkjenn/EKVWZ
erklære/EJORSYt
erstatt/CEKVZ
esoterisk/VX
estimere/EJORSYZtz
europeisere/EJORSYt
europeisk/VXz
falsifisere/EJORSYZt
familiær/VWX
fasettere/EJORSYtz
fast/ACEGKVXwz
fatte/CEJMRSTYZu
femsylindret/CMTX
fendre/CEFGHJMRSTYt
filantropisk/VX
filme/ACEFGHJMRSTYttz
firebladet/CMTX
firføtte/Y
fjottet/CTX
flate/ACEGHJMRSTYtyz
flerregional/VWX
fluoridere/EJOSYt
flytte/CEJMRSTYZtz
fløyelsblank/VWX
fløyte/ACEGHJMRSTYZtz
folkeminnevidenskap/AZ
forakt/ACEGKVZz
forberede/EJSYtvz
forbrenn/EKVWZ
forbruke/BCEFGHJORSYZt
fordektig/VX
forderv/CEGKVZ
foreldrestyre/CEGWY
foren/CEKVWXZu
forføye/CEJMQRSTYy
forhatt/VX
forhåndsinnstille/Z
forhåne/EJMORSTYtv
forlik/BCEGHKVWZz
forløpe/BCEGHJOSYt
formast/CEGKVZ
forminsk/CEKVZ
formsvak/VWX
fornærm/CEKVZ
forpeste/CEJMSTY
forråtn/CEKVZ
forskrekk/CEKVZ
forskrudd/VX
forskuttere/EJORSYt
forsverje/CEJMSTY
fortap/EKVWZ
fortrinnlig/VXw
fortryt/EKVZ
fortære/EJORSWYt
forøke/CJSYv
fragmentarisk/VX
fravriste/CEJMSTY
fred/ACEGJKVZ]
fremlut/VX
frontal/VWXz
frukte/ACEGHJMRSTZ
frysetørke/CEJMSTY
futurisk/VX
fyrst/AEFGHKVZz
fælne/CEJMSTY
føl/BCEGHKVWZ
følg/ACEGKVWXZ
førlig/VXwz
gange/ACEFGHJMRSTYZt
gapet/CJTUX
garve/CEJMSTYt
geofysisk/VX
gingival/VWX
gispe/CEGJMSTYt
gjenbruke/CEGJOSYZ
gjenkall/KWZ
gjenvinne/EGJRSZ_t
gjette/CEJMRSTYZtz
glad/CGVXZz
glasifluvial/VWX
glise/ABCEGHJOSTYty
glømsom/VWX
golvlegge/EJSUY
granittisk/VX
gress/BCEGHKVZz
grinde/ACEGHJMRSTYt
grip/EKVZ
grisk/aVWXwz
gru/ACEGHJKPSVWYZ
gråøyd/VX
grøde/ACEGJQSYz
gud/AEFGHJZ\_z
gullinnrammet/CMTX
gøye/ACEJMRSTYt
habsburgisk/VX
hanlig/VX
hardtrene/CEJMSTY
harm/ACEGKVWZ
heilbefaren/VWX
heilstøype/EJSY
helbred/ACEGKVZ\]
helhvit/VX
hend/CEFGHKVWZ
henrekne/CEJMSTY
heraldisk/VX
herskap/BCEGZ\
hieroglyfisk/VX
hikke/ABCDEGJMRSTYt
holdbar/VWXw
holde/BCEGHJORSYZ`tyz
hovedinndele/EJOYt
hugg/BCEGHKVXz
husholdsvitenskap/AZ
huslig/VX
hutre/CEJMRSTYt
hypnotisk/VX
håndsy/JLSY
høgrød/VWX
høre/EJORSUYZ_tz
iberisk/VX
identifisere/EJORSYZ_tz
igjenfylle/EJSY
ikke-produktiv/VWX
imperativisk/VX
indeksregulere/EJORYt
individualisere/EJORSYZt
ingeniørvidenskap/AZ
innbyde/EQSYtv
innenriksk/VX
innlede/CEFJMRSTY`y
innløys/EKVZ
innskyte/EFJSYtv
integrere/EJOSY_tz
interpretativ/VWX
isolere/EJOSY_tz
jag/BCEGKVXz
jomfru/ACEGHZz
jule/ACDEGJOORSYtz
justerbar/VWX
kantfrese/EGJOSY
karminrød/VWX
kausjonere/EJORSYt
kislen/VWX
kjemme/CEGJMRSTY
kjenne/CEFGJRSWYZ_tuvxz
klarne/CEJMSTYt
kleimen/VWX
klekk/CEGKVWXZ
klosse/ACEGHTYt
knarre/ACEGJMSTYt
knepen/KVWXw
knuffe/CEJMSTY
kommentere/EJOSYt
kompakt/VXz
kondensere/AEJORSYZt
konservere/EJORSY_t
konstruktivistisk/VX
korne/BCEGHJMRSTY
kort/BCEGHKVXwz
kos/ACEGKVWXZ
krasse/CEJMSTYt
kromplettere/EJOSY
kruslet/CMTX
kulere/Y
kunstvitenskap/EGZ
kvadratisk/VX
kvaste/ACEGHJMSTY
kyte/BCEGJSY
laksraud/VWX
landbruksvitenskap/AZu
late/AACEJMSTYtx
laus/EKVWXZ^
leg/ACEFGHKVWXZ
lemp/CEGKVZ
lenge/CEGJOQRSTYz
lev/CEGKVZ
likblek/VWX
lirke/CEJMSTYt
litteraturvitenskap/AZu
lufte/ACEGJMRSTYtz
lugn/CEKVWX
lystre/CEFGJMRSTYt
lågkirkelig/VX
låne/BCEGHJORSYZz
løse/EJORSYZ`uyz
maksimere/EJORSYtz
malisiøs/VWX
manøvrere/EJORSYZ_t
matche/ACEGJMRSTY
maurisk/VX
mene/CEGHJORSWY_t
messiansk/VX
minn/BCEGHKVWZ
mishandle/CEGHJMSTYt
mjølkeblå/VWX
mobilisere/EJOSYZ_tz
modulere/EJORSYtz
motorisk/VXz
mulktere/EJORSY
musikkvitskap/EGZ
møllett/VX
møne/BCEGHJORSYz
naturvidenskap/AEGHZu
nebbelig/VX
nedbryt/Z
nedstemme/EJRY
nordenfjelsk/VX
nugge/BCEGJMSTY
nuss/CEGKVZ
nyopp-pusset/CMTX
nøle/CEGJOSYt
odontologisk/VX
omhylle/CEJMSTY
omstøt/EKVZ
omsy/JLSY
oppdekket/CMTX
oppklare/EORSY_ty
oppnå/JKLPSYZv
oppsummere/EJORSY_t
opptråkket/CMTX
organisere/EJORSYZ_tz
overflatebehandle/EJMWYt
overta/MY
overveldig/VX
parere/EJORSYt
passere/AEJORSYZ_tz
pastos/VWX
perforere/EJORSYt
pinlig/VXw
pisse/CEGJMMSTTY
pludre/CEJMRSTYt
polytonal/VWX
populærvitenskap/AZu
prale/CEGJORSWY
presumtiv/VWX
profanere/EJOSY
prute/CEGJMRSTY`
prøveflyg/EKVX
putre/CEJMRSTY
pynt/ACEGHKVZ
påtale/AEGJORSY[z
påvirk/CEKVZ
rabid/VX
ramme/ACEGHJMRSTYz
reagere/EJOSYz
realvitenskap/EGZ
refundere/EJORSYZt
regal/CEGVWX
rekne/eCCEEJJMRRSSTYY
religionsvitskap/EGZ
reprodusere/EJORSZu
residere/EJOSYt
rett/ACEFGHJKVXZ[\z
reversere/EJORSYZ_t
rifle/ACEGHJMSTYz
rokke/ACEGHJMRSTYt
rudimentær/VWX
runke/CEJMSTY
råd/BCEGHJKVZ\z
rødme/ACEGJMRSTYtz
sabbet/CMTX
samene/EJOSY
samkjøre/EJORSZ_t
sangbar/VWXw
sans/ACEGHKVZz
saue/ACEFGHJMRSTY
seile/BCDEFGHJORSYZ_tz
sekundær/VWXz
senke/CEJMRSTYZ_`ty
sentrere/EJORSYtz
serøs/VWX
single/ABCEGJMSTYtz
sivilisatorisk/VX
sjofle/CEJMSTY
sjukepleievitenskap/AZ
sjørettslig/VX
skarpslipe/EJSY
skatte/ACEGHJMRSTYZ[z
skjefte/CEGJMSTY
skjegglaus/VWX
skolefly/CGY
skritte/BCEGHJMSTYt
skrumpen/VWX
skure/ABCEGHJMORSTYtz
skyve/CEGJRSWYZ
skøye/ACEGJMOSTY
sleiket/CMTUX
slentre/CEGJMRSTYtz
sluntre/CEJMRSTYt
smak/ACEGJKVWZ\]z
smekke/ACEGHJMRSTYt
smikkfull/VWX
snabbe/ACEGJMSTY
snorkle/CEGJMSTY
snupp/ACEGKVZ
snåp/VWX
sope/CEGJOSWYtz
sparsomsommelig/VX
spenne/ABCEGHJRSY_tz
spis/EGKVWZ
spore/ABCDEGHJMORSTYZ_tz
språkvitenskap/AZu
spurte/ACEGJMRSTY
stakkarslig/VX
statsvidenskap/AZu
stave/ACEGHJMRSTYtvz
stikle/CEJMSTY
straff-fri/VWX
straffe/ACEGHJMRSTYZ[z
strekk/ACEGKVWZz
stryke/ACEGHJRSWY`ttyz
stygg/AKVXZwz
styggrask/VWX
støkke/AEGHJSWY
suspekt/VX
sve/CDYt
syk/EGKVWXZu
symbolsk/VX
syne/BCEGHJOQRSYZ
syre/ACEGHJORSWYyz
søt/CEGKVXZ^uz
søtlig/VX
tegne/BCEFGHJMRSTY_tz
tekk/CEGKVWXZ
teleskopisk/VX
tenke/EJORSYZtuyz
tilføken/VX
tilhogge/EJMSTY
tillat/EKVZ
tilsted/EKWZ
tinne/BCEGRY
tofarget/CMTX
tolke/ACEGHJMRSTYZ_`tyz
trangviksk/VX
trappe/ACEGHJMSTYz
tribalistisk/VX
trøe/ACEGHRSWY
tufs/ACEGHKVWX
tverrvidenskap/AZ
tynnhåret/MTX
tære/EJMORSTYt
tøy/ABCEGHJKSVYZ
ubegrunnet/CMTX
ubrytelig/VX
ufrakommelig/VX
uhjelp/AZ\
ujamn/VX
umannslig/VX
undere/BCJZ
unnvære/EJORSY
uoppdrivelig/VX
uralsk/VX
uråd/CZ
uskjønn/VWXZ
uskyldshvit/VX
utbløytt/VX
utekk/VWXZ
uthold/EKVWZ
utkomme/CEGJRSWY
utlignelig/VX
utnytte/CEJMRSTYZ_tvz
utrøtt/VZ
utskrive/EIJRSYZ_`ty
utspilt/VX
uttal/ACEGKVWZ
uuttalt/VX
uvennskap/ABCEGZ
vakle/CEJMSTYt
valen/JVWX
vannløs/VZ
vassyk/VWX
veie/AEFGHJMOQRSTYZtuz
veite/CEGJMRSTY
venetiansk/VX
vent/CEGKVZ
viktig/VXwz
virvle/CEGHJMSTY
viss/aCCEGVWXZw
voldelig/VX
våd/CEGVZ
yemenittisk/VX
yte/CEGJMSTYtv
åpene/RZ
økologisk/VXz
